Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corp 10-Q Sep 16 2016 | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corp (IMMA)FORM 10-Q | Quarterly ReportSep 16 2016|About: Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corp (IMMA)View as PDF

 INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION Corp (Form: 10-Q, Received: 09/16/2016 08:03:17) 












	 
















	UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION








	Washington, D.C. 20549








	 








	FORM 10-Q








	 






	 








	 






	 








	☒






	QUARTERLY
	REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE
	ACT OF 1934








	 






	For the
	quarterly period ended July 31, 2016








	 






	 








	☐






	TRANSITION
	REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE
	ACT OF 1934








	 






	For the
	transition period from ___________ to ___________








	 








	Commission
	File Number 333-185909








	 








	Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation








	(Exact
	name of registrant as specified in its charter)








	 








	British Virgin Islands






	n/a








	(State
	or other jurisdiction of incorporation or
	organization)






	(I.R.S.
	Employer Identification No.)








	 






	 








	Vanterpool Plaza, 2

	nd

	Floor, Wickhams Cay
	I






	 








	Road Town, Tortola, British Virgin Islands






	 








	(Address
	of principal executive offices)






	(Zip
	Code)








	 








	(284) 494-5959








	(Registrant’s
	telephone number)








	 








	n/a








	(Former
	name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last
	report)









	 




	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports
	required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
	Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such
	shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
	reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements
	for the past 90 days.








	☒






	Yes






	 






	☐






	No








	 




	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically
	and posted on its corporate Web site, if any, every Interactive
	Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405
	of Regulation S-T (§ 232.405 of this chapter) during the
	preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant
	was required to submit and post such files).








	☒






	Yes






	 






	☐






	No








	 




	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer,
	an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, or a smaller
	reporting company. See the definitions of “large accelerated
	filer,” “accelerated filer” and “smaller
	reporting company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange
	Act.








	Large
	accelerated filer ☐






	Accelerated
	filer ☐








	Non-accelerated
	filer ☐






	Smaller
	reporting company ☒








	 




	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined
	in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).








	☐






	Yes






	 






	☒






	No








	 




	Indicate
	the number of shares outstanding of each of the issuer’s
	classes of common stock, as of the latest practicable date:



	As of September 9, 2016, the issuer had one
	class of common stock, with a par value of $0.00025, of which
	46,200,000 shares were issued and outstanding.





	 










	 










	 










	 




	TABLE OF CONTENTS




	 








	 






	 






	Page








	 






	PART I—FINANCIAL INFORMATION






	 








	 






	 






	 









	Item
	1:








	Financial
	Statements:







	 








	 











	 








	 







	Unaudited Balance
	Sheets as at July 31, 2016, and October 31,
	2015








	3









	 











	 








	 







	Unaudited
	Statements of Operations for the Three and Nine Months Ended July
	31, 2016 and 2015








	4









	 











	 








	 







	Unaudited
	Statements of Cash Flows for the Nine Months Ended July 31, 2016
	and 2015








	5










	 






	 






	 








	 







	Notes to Financial
	Statements (Unaudited)








	6










	 






	 






	 









	Item
	2:








	Management’s
	Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
	Operations








	10









	 






	 






	 









	Item
	3:








	Quantitative and
	Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk








	11










	 






	 






	 









	Item
	4:








	Controls and
	Procedures








	12










	 






	 






	 








	 







	PART II—OTHER INFORMATION







	 








	 






	 






	 









	Item
	2:








	Unregistered Sales
	of Equity Securities and Use of Proceeds







	12








	 






	 






	 









	Item
	5:








	Other
	Events







	12








	 






	 






	 









	Item
	6:








	Exhibits








	12










	 






	 






	 








	 







	Signatures







	13









	 




	 






	 




	2










	 










	 






	PART I—FINANCIAL INFORMATION




	 






	ITEM
	1. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS









	 




	INTERACTIVE MULTI-MEDIA AUCTION CORPORATION






	Balance Sheets






	July 31, 2016 and October 31, 2015




	(United States Dollars)




	 















	 






	 




	July 31,




	 






	 




	October 31,




	 








	 






	 




	2016




	 






	 




	2015




	 








	 






	 




	(unaudited)




	 






	 




	 




	 










	Assets






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 








	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 








	Current assets:






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 








	Cash






	 


	$


	13,988


	 






	 


	$


	5,886


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Total current assets






	 


	$


	13,988


	 






	 


	$


	5,886


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Liabilities and Stockholders' Deficit






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Current liabilities:






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Accounts
	payable






	 


	$


	4,390


	 






	 


	$


	8,433


	 








	Due
	to shareholders






	 


	 


	101,284


	 






	 


	 


	83,876


	 








	Total
	current liabilities






	 


	 


	105,674


	 






	 


	 


	92,309


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Long-term
	liability






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Loan
	payable






	 


	 


	27,500


	 






	 


	 


	27,500


	 








	Total liabilities






	 


	 


	133,174


	 






	 


	 


	119,809


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Stockholders' Deficit






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Capital
	stock:






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	$0.00025
	par value, authorized 400,000,000 shares,






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	issued
	and outstanding 46,200,000 shares






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 (2015
	- 45,200,000 shares)






	 


	 


	11,550


	 






	 


	 


	11,300


	 








	Additional
	paid-in capital






	 


	 


	522,175


	 






	 


	 


	497,425


	 








	Accumulated
	deficit






	 


	 


	(652,911


	)






	 


	 


	(622,648


	)








	Total
	stockholders' deficit






	 


	 


	(119,186


	)






	 


	 


	(113,923


	)








	Total liabilities and stockholders' deficit






	 


	$


	13,988


	 






	 


	$


	5,886


	 









	 





	See accompanying notes to financial
	statements






	 






	 




	3










	 






	 







	INTERACTIVE MULTI-MEDIA AUCTION CORPORATION






	Statement of Operations




	For the three and nine months ended July 31, 2016 and
	2015




	(United States Dollars)




	(unaudited)









	 








	 






	 




	Three months ended July 31




	 






	 




	Nine months ended July 31




	 








	 






	 




	2016




	 






	 




	2015




	 






	 




	2016




	 






	 




	2015




	 








	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 








	Revenue






	 


	$


	-


	 






	 


	$


	-


	 






	 


	$


	-


	 






	 


	$


	-


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Expenses:






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	General
	and administrative






	 


	 


	10,139


	 






	 


	 


	6,417


	 






	 


	 


	30,262


	 






	 


	 


	29,606


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Total
	operating expenses






	 


	 


	10,139


	 






	 


	 


	6,417


	 






	 


	 


	30,262


	 






	 


	 


	29,606


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Net Loss






	 


	$


	(10,139


	)






	 


	$


	(6,417


	)






	 


	$


	(30,262


	)






	 


	$


	(29,606


	)








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Net
	loss per share






	 


	$


	(0.00


	)






	 


	$


	(0.00


	)






	 


	$


	(0.00


	)






	 


	$


	(0.00


	)








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Weighted
	average number of shares outstanding






	 


	 


	46,200,000


	 






	 


	 


	45,200,000


	 






	 


	 


	45,543,066


	 






	 


	 


	45,200,000


	 









	 




	See accompanying notes to financial statements




	 






	 




	4










	 










	 





	INTERACTIVE MULTI-MEDIA AUCTION CORPORATION




	Statements of Cash Flows




	For the nine months ended July 31, 2016 and 2015




	(United States Dollars)




	(unaudited)




	 









	 






	 




	2016




	 






	 




	2015




	 








	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 








	Cash flows from operating activities:






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 








	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 










	Net
	loss






	 


	$


	(30,262


	)






	 


	$


	(29,606


	)








	Adjustments
	to reconcile net loss to






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	net
	cash used in operating activities:






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Changes
	in assets and liabilities






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	   Accounts
	payable






	 


	 


	(4,044


	)






	 


	 


	(10,435


	)








	Net
	cash used in operating activities






	 


	 


	(34,306


	)






	 


	 


	(40,041


	)








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Cash
	provided by financing activities:






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Proceeds
	from sale of common stock






	 


	 


	25,000


	 






	 


	 


	-


	 








	Advances
	from shareholders






	 


	 


	17,408


	 






	 


	 


	40,041


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Net
	cash provided by financing activities






	 


	 


	42,408


	 






	 


	 


	40,041


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Change
	in cash






	 


	 


	8,102


	 






	 


	 


	-


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Cash
	at beginning of the period






	 


	 


	5,886


	 






	 


	 


	-


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Cash at end of the period






	 


	$


	13,988


	 






	 


	$


	-


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	 






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	Cash
	paid for:






	 


	 


	 


	 






	 


	 


	 


	 








	    Interest
	paid






	 


	$


	-


	 






	 


	$


	-


	 








	    Income
	taxes






	 


	$


	-


	 






	 


	$


	-


	 









	 




	See accompanying notes to financial statements.




	 






	 




	5










	 






	 




	Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation






	NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	July 31, 2016




	(unaudited)




	 




	Note 1. Description of Business and Summary of Significant
	Accounting Policies




	 




	Organization




	 




	Interactive
	Multi-Media Auction Corporation. (the “Company”) was
	incorporated under the laws of the British Virgin Islands on July
	13, 2012. The Company is in the business of an internet based
	marketer, auctioneer, dealer and broker of high quality and unique
	products and services for fine art, fashion, design and
	décor.




	 




	Interim Period Financial Statements




	 




	The
	accompanying unaudited interim financial statements have been
	prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting
	principles in the United States (“GAAP”) for interim
	financial information and with the Securities and Exchange
	Commission’s instructions. Accordingly, they do not include
	all the information and footnotes required by GAAP for complete
	financial statements. The results of operations reflect interim
	adjustments, all of which are of a normal recurring nature and, in
	the opinion of management, are necessary for a fair presentation of
	the results for such interim period. The results reported in these
	interim financial statements should not be regarded as necessarily
	indicative of results that may be expected for the entire year.
	Certain information and note disclosure normally included in
	financial statements prepared in accordance with GAAP have been
	condensed or omitted pursuant to the Securities and Exchange
	Commission’s rules and regulations. These unaudited interim
	financial statements should be read in conjunction with the audited
	financial statements for the year ended October 31, 2015, as filed
	with the Securities and Exchange Commission on February 10,
	2016.




	 




	Going Concern




	 




	The
	Company’s financial statements have been prepared in
	conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the
	United States applicable to a going concern which contemplates the
	realization of assets and liquidation of liabilities in the normal
	course of business. The Company has not generated any revenue since
	commencement of the development stage, has an accumulated deficit,
	and has had no positive cash flows from operations. It is the
	Company’s intention to raise additional equity to finance
	development of a market for its products until positive cash flows
	can be generated from its operations. However, there can be no
	assurance that such additional funds will be available to the
	Company when required or on terms acceptable to the Company. Such
	limitations could have a material adverse effect on the
	Company’s business, financial condition or operations, and
	these financial statements do not include any adjustment that could
	result. Failure to obtain sufficient additional funding would
	necessitate the Company to reduce or limit its operating activities
	or even discontinue operations.




	  




	Cash




	 




	Cash
	equivalents with maturity dates less than 90 days from the date of
	origination are considered to be cash equivalents for all financial
	reporting purposes. The Company currently has cash equivalents of
	$13,988 as of July 31, 2016.




	 




	Fair Value Measurements




	 




	Fair
	value is defined as the exchange price that will be received for an
	asset or paid to transfer a liability (an exit price) in the
	principal. Valuation techniques used to measure fair value should
	maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of
	unobservable inputs. To measure fair value, the Company uses the
	following fair value hierarchy based on three levels of inputs, of
	which the first two are considered to be observable and the third
	unobservable:




	 




	Level 1
	– Quoted prices in active markets for identical assets or
	liabilities.




	 




	Level 2
	– Inputs other than Level 1 that are observable, either
	directly or indirectly, such as quoted prices for similar assets or
	liabilities; quoted prices in markets that are not active; or other
	inputs that are observable or can be corroborated by observable
	market data for substantially the full term of the assets or
	liabilities.




	 




	Level 3
	– Unobservable inputs are supported by little or no market
	activity and are significant to the fair value of the assets or
	liabilities.




	 






	 




	6










	 






	 




	Revenue Recognition




	 




	The
	Company recognizes revenue when it is realized or realizable and
	earned. The Company considers revenue, which includes charges on a
	transactional and other basis, realized or realizable and earned
	when the following criteria are met: persuasive evidence of an
	arrangement exists, delivery has occurred or services have been
	rendered, price is fixed and determinable, and collectability is
	reasonably assured.




	 




	Advertising Expenses




	 




	Advertising
	costs are expensed as incurred. The Company did not incur any
	advertising costs during the three and nine month periods ended
	July 31, 2016 and 2015.




	 




	Income Taxes




	 




	Deferred
	income tax assets and liabilities are determined based on temporary
	differences between financial reporting and tax bases of assets and
	liabilities, operating loss, and tax credit carryforwards, and are
	measured using the enacted income tax rates and laws that will be
	in effect when the differences are expected to be recovered or
	settled. Realization of certain deferred income tax assets is
	dependent upon generating sufficient taxable income in the
	appropriate jurisdiction. The Company records a valuation allowance
	to reduce deferred income tax assets to amounts that are more
	likely than not to be realized. The initial recording and any
	subsequent changes to valuation allowances are based on a number of
	factors (positive and negative evidence). The Company considers its
	actual historical results to have a stronger weight than other,
	more subjective, indicators when considering whether to establish
	or reduce a valuation allowance.




	 




	The
	Company continually evaluates its uncertain income tax positions
	and may record a liability for any unrecognized tax benefits
	resulting from uncertain income tax positions taken or expected to
	be taken in an income tax return. Estimated interest and penalties
	are recorded as a component of interest expense and other expense,
	respectively.




	 




	Because
	tax laws are complex and subject to different interpretations,
	significant judgment is required. As a result, the Company makes
	certain estimates and assumptions in: (1) calculating its income
	tax expense, deferred tax assets, and deferred tax liabilities; (2)
	determining any valuation allowance recorded against deferred tax
	assets; and (3) evaluating the amount of unrecognized tax benefits,
	as well as the interest and penalties related to such uncertain tax
	positions. The Company’s estimates and assumptions may differ
	significantly from tax benefits ultimately realized.




	 




	As the
	Company is incorporated in the British Virgin Islands as an
	international corporporation it is not subject to any corporate
	income taxes in the British Virgin Islands..




	 




	Net Loss Per Share




	 




	Basic
	net loss per share is calculated by dividing the net loss
	attributable to common shareholders by the weighted average number
	of common shares outstanding in the period. Diluted loss per share
	takes into consideration common shares outstanding (computed under
	basic loss per share) and potentially dilutive securities. For the
	nine month periods ended July 31, 2016 and 2015, there are no
	outstanding stock options and warrants. Common shares issuable are
	considered outstanding as of the original approval date for
	purposes of earnings per share computations.




	 




	Foreign Currencies




	 




	Assets
	and liabilities recorded in foreign currencies are translated at
	the exchange rate on the balance sheet date. Revenue and expenses
	are translated at average rates of exchange prevailing during the
	year. Translation adjustments resulting from this process are
	recorded to Other Comprehensive Income.




	For the
	three and nine month periods ended July 31, 2016 and 2015 the
	Company did not have material translation adjustments and
	accordingly, no statement of comprehensive income (loss) is
	included in the accompanying financial statements.




	 






	 




	7










	 










	 




	Use of Estimates




	 




	The
	preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting
	principles generally accepted in the United States requires
	management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the
	reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosures of
	contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial
	statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during
	the fiscal year. The Company bases its estimates on historical
	experience, current conditions and on other assumptions that it
	believes to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results
	could differ from those estimates and assumptions.




	 




	Financial Instruments




	 




	The
	Company has the following financial instruments: accounts payable
	and loan payable. The carrying value of these financial instruments
	approximates their fair value due to their liquidity or their
	short-term nature.




	 




	Share Issuances for Services, Debt Instruments and
	Interest




	 




	The
	Company issues instruments to non-employees for the receipt of
	goods and services, and, in certain circumstances the settlement of
	short-term loan arrangements. The applicable GAAP

	establishes that share-based payment transactions
	with nonemployees shall be measured at the fair value of the
	consideration received or the fair value of the equity instruments
	issued, whichever is more reliably measurable.





	 




	In these transactions, the Company issues unregistered and
	restricted equity instruments. Additionally, the Company currently
	has no shares of freely-tradeable stock with a quoted market price
	(a Level 1input within the GAAP hierarchy).




	 





	When unregistered common shares are issued for the settlement of
	short-term financing arrangements (that are not initially
	convertible), the reacquisition price of the extinguished financing
	arrangement is determined by the value of the debt which is more
	clearly evident, and no

	additional inducement expense is
	recognized.




	 




	In situations in which the Company issues unregistered restricted
	common shares in exchange for goods and services, and the value of
	the goods and services are not the most reliably measurable, the
	Company recognizes the fair value of the unregistered restricted
	equity instruments based on the value of similar instruments issued
	in private placements in exchange for cash in the most recent
	transactions (a Level 2 input within the GAAP hierarchy). The
	Company has determined this methodology reflects the risk adjusted
	fair value of its unregistered restricted equity instruments using
	a commercially reasonable valuation technique.




	 




	Comprehensive Income (Loss)




	 




	Our
	company has no components of other comprehensive income (loss) and
	accordingly, no statement of comprehensive income (loss) is
	included in the accompanying financial statements.




	 




	Recent Accounting Pronouncements




	 




	In May
	2014, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”)
	issued Accounting Standard Update (“ASU”) 2014-09
	– Revenue From Contracts with Customers, which will supersede
	nearly all existing revenue recognition guidance under U.S. GAAP.
	The core principal of this ASU is that an entity should recognize
	revenue when it transfers promised goods or services to customers
	in an amount that reflects the consideration to which the entity
	expects to be entitled in exchange for those goods or services.
	This ASU also requires additional disclosure about the nature,
	amount, timing and uncertainty of revenue and cash flows arising
	from customer contracts, including significant judgments and
	changes in judgments and assets recognized from costs incurred to
	obtain or fulfill a contract.




	 




	In June
	2014, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued Accounting
	Standards Update No. 2014-10, which eliminated certain financial
	reporting requirements of companies previously identified as
	"Development Stage Entities" (Topic 915). The amendments in this
	ASU simplify accounting guidance by removing all incremental
	financial reporting requirements for development stage entities.
	The amendments also reduce data maintenance and, for those entities
	subject to audit, audit costs by eliminating the requirement for
	development stage entities to present inception-to-date information
	in the statements of income, cash flows, and shareholder
	equity.   Early application of each of the amendments is
	permitted for any annual reporting period or interim period for
	which the entity's financial statements have not yet been issued
	(public business entities) or made available for issuance (other
	entities). Upon adoption, entities will no longer present or
	disclose any information required by Topic 915.  The Company
	has adopted this standard.




	 






	 




	8










	 






	 




	The
	original effective date for ASU 2014-09 would have required the
	Company to adopt beginning in its first quarter 2017. In July 2015,
	the FASB voted to amend ASU 2014-09 by approving a one year
	deferral of the effective date as well as providing the option to
	early adopt the standard on the original effective date.
	Accordingly, the Company may adopt the standard in either its first
	quarter of 2017 or 2018. The new revenue standard may be applied
	retrospectively to each prior period presented or retrospectively
	with the cumulative effect recognized as of the date of adoption.
	The Company is currently evaluating the timing of its adoption and
	the impact of adopting the new revenue standard on its financial
	statements.




	 




	Note 2. Long-term Loan Payable




	 




	The
	loan of $27,500, payable to a shareholder of the Company, is
	unsecured, non-interest bearing and due on or before October 31,
	2017.




	 




	Note 3. Related Party Transactions




	 




	During
	the nine months ended July 31, 2016 and 2015 shareholders of the
	Company advanced $17,408 and $40,041, respectively. The balances
	owing as at July 31, 2016 of $101,284 is included in advances due
	to shareholders.




	 




	During
	the nine months ended July 31, 2016 and 2015 the Company’s
	president and sole director provided managements services in the
	amount of $1,000 and $nil, respectively.







	Note 4. Share Capital




	 




	The
	Company is authorized to issue 400,000,000 shares of capital stock,
	par value of $0.00025.




	 




	The
	shares can be divided into such classes and series as the directors
	may determine. As at July 31, 2016 the Company only has one class
	and series of shares.




	 




	On
	December 30, 2014, the Board of Directors approved the
	forward-split of the issued and outstanding common stock on the
	basis of four new shares for each share, effective upon the
	approval of the regulatory authorities. The Company’s common
	stock was forward-split effective as of February 3,
	2015.




	 




	The
	application of the forward-split has been shown retroactively in
	these financial statements.




	 




	During
	the nine months ended July 31, 2016, the Company:




	 






	●




	On April 29, 2016
	issued 1,000,000 shares for cash proceeds of $25,000.






	 




	For
	additional details of stock issuances prior to the nine months
	ended July 31, 2016 please see the Form 10-K for the fiscal year
	ended October 31, 2015 filed with the Securities Exchange
	Commission on February 10, 2016.




	 






	Note 5. Subsequent Event




	 




	Subsequent
	to July 31, 2016 the Company repaid shareholder advances in the
	amount of $11,750.




	 






	 




	9










	 













	 






	I


	TEM
	2. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS


	OF
	FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS




	 




	The
	following discussion should be read in conjunction with the
	accompanying unaudited financial statements for the three and
	nine-month periods ended July 31, 2016 and 2015, and our annual
	report on Form 10-K for the year ended October 31, 2015, including
	the financial statements and notes thereto.




	 




	Forward-Looking Information May Prove Inaccurate




	 




	This
	report contains statements about the future, sometimes referred to
	as “forward-looking” statements. Forward-looking
	statements are typically identified by the use of the words
	“believe,” “may,” “could,”
	“should,” “expect,”
	“anticipate,” “estimate,”
	“project,” “propose,” “plan,”
	“intend,” and similar words and expressions. Statements
	that describe our future strategic plans, goals, or objectives are
	also forward-looking statements.




	 




	Readers
	of this report are cautioned that any forward-looking statements,
	including those regarding our management’s current beliefs,
	expectations, anticipations, estimations, projections, proposals,
	plans, or intentions, are not guarantees of future performance or
	results of events and involve risks and uncertainties. The
	forward-looking information is based on present circumstances and
	on our predictions respecting events that have not occurred, that
	may not occur, or that may occur with different consequences from
	those now assumed or anticipated. Actual events or results may
	differ materially from those discussed in the forward-looking
	statements as a result of various factors. The forward-looking
	statements included in this report are made only as of the date of
	this report. We are not obligated to update such forward-looking
	statements to reflect subsequent events or
	circumstances.




	 




	Introduction




	 




	Our
	business is intended to be based on marketing and selling products
	using an on-line e-commerce platform which provides a live
	streaming auction production. In contrast to sites like Ebay or
	bid.com, which for the most part are driven by sales of items that,
	given their mass production, have become “commodities”
	that anyone can buy and access from an infinite amount of vendors
	and providers at extremely low prices, it is our goal to offer only
	unique and valued products and goods. We believe that there is
	significant interest for products and services of particular
	distinction; with great demand for items actually produced from all
	parts of the world.  We believe that for reasons of
	geography, demography, or simply lack of marketing and advertising
	resources, many extraordinary products simply remain unnoticed by
	the mass market.  Consequently, we plan to operate a
	real-time auction internet streaming broadcast from various
	geographic locations around the world that will focus specifically
	on representing and promoting distinct and innovative goods
	produced by local manufacturers, purveyors, designers and
	creators.  Viewers across the globe will be able to view
	the action on their computers, Ipads or mobile phones, and they
	will be able to participate by bidding on the items via telephone
	or the internet.




	 




	During
	the quarter ended July 31, 2016, discussions have continued with
	various types of product and service providers in terms of
	establishing formal working relationships with them at such time
	that we are capable of undertaking our initial business launch, yet
	these discussions still have not resulted into a material
	agreement, and there can be no assurance that we will have any
	formal agreement with any party at all.




	 




	We
	additionally plan to establish and operate a user-friendly and
	functional e-commerce website in support of our on-line sales
	business once operational..




	 






	 




	10










	 






	Results of Operations




	 




	Comparison of the Three and Nine Months Ended July 31,
	2016




	with the Three and Nine Months Ended July 31, 2015




	 




	We had
	no gross revenue for the respective three and nine-month periods
	ended July 31, 2016 and 2015.




	 




	Our
	general and administrative expenses from continuing operations for
	the three and nine months ended July 31, 2016, were $10,139 and
	$30,262, respectively, as compared to $6,417 and $29,606,
	respectively, for the comparable three and nine-month periods ended
	July 31, 2015.




	 




	Overall,
	we have a net loss of $10,139 and $30,262 for the respective three
	and nine months ended July 31, 2016, as compared to a net loss of
	$6,417 and $29,606, respectively, for the corresponding three and
	nine-month periods of the preceding year.




	 




	Liquidity and Capital Resources




	 




	As of
	July 31, 2016, our current assets were $13,988, as compared to
	$5,886 at October 31, 2015. As of July 31, 2016, our current
	liabilities were $105,674, as compared to $92,309 at
	October 31, 2015.




	 




	Operating
	activities used net cash of $34,306 for the nine months ended July
	31, 2016, as compared to use of $40,041 for the nine months ended
	July 31, 2015.




	 




	Net
	cash of $42,408 was provided by financing activities during the
	nine months ended July 31, 2016, as compared to $40,041 net cash
	provided during the comparable nine months ended July 31, 2015.
	Financing activities during the nine months ended July 31, 2016
	included $25,000 proceeds from the sale of common stock and $17,408
	in advances from shareholders as compared to $40,041 of advances
	from shareholders for the nine months ended July 31,
	2015.




	 




	Our
	current balances of cash will not meet our working capital and
	capital expenditure needs for the whole of the current year.
	Because we are not currently generating sufficient cash to fund our
	operations, we will need to rely on external financing to meet
	future capital and operating requirements. Any projections of
	future cash needs and cash flows are subject to substantial
	uncertainty. Our capital requirements depend upon several factors,
	including the rate of market acceptance, our ability to get to
	production and generate revenues, our level of expenditures for
	production, marketing, and sales, purchases of equipment, and other
	factors. We can make no assurance that financing will be available
	in amounts or on terms acceptable to us, if at all. Further, if we
	issue equity securities, stockholders may experience additional
	dilution or the new equity securities may have rights, preferences,
	or privileges senior to those of existing holders of common stock,
	and debt financing, if available, may involve restrictive covenants
	that could restrict our operations or finances. If we cannot raise
	funds, when needed, on acceptable terms, we may not be able to
	continue our operations, grow market share, take advantage of
	future opportunities, or respond to competitive pressures or
	unanticipated requirements, all of which could negatively impact
	our business, operating results, and financial
	condition.





	 






	ITEM 3. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET
	RISK




	 




	Not
	applicable.




	 






	 




	11










	 









	ITEM 4. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES




	 




	Disclosure
	controls are procedures that are designed with the objective of
	ensuring that information required to be disclosed in our reports
	filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, such as this
	quarterly report, is recorded, processed, summarized, and reported
	within the time periods specified in the SEC’s rules and
	forms. Disclosure controls are also designed with the objective of
	ensuring that such information is accumulated and communicated to
	our management, including our principal executive officer and
	principal financial officers (our “Certifying
	Officers”) , as appropriate, to allow timely decisions
	regarding required disclosure. Our management evaluated, with the
	participation of our Certifying Officers, the effectiveness of our
	disclosure controls and procedures as of July 31, 2016, pursuant to
	Rule 13a-15(b) under the Exchange Act. Based upon that evaluation,
	our Certifying Officers concluded that, as of July 31, 2016, our
	disclosure controls and procedures were not effective.




	 




	There
	have been no changes in our internal control over financial
	reporting that occurred during the quarter ended July 31, 2016,
	that have materially affected or are reasonably likely to
	materially affect our internal control over financial
	reporting.






	 




	 






	       PART
	II—OTHER INFORMATION




	 






	ITEM 2. UNREGISTERED SALES OF EQUITY SECURITIES AND USE OF
	PROCEEDS




	 




	Not
	applicable





	 






	ITEM 5. OTHER EVENTS




	 




	Not
	applicable





	 






	ITEM 6. EXHIBITS




	 




	The
	following exhibits are filed as a part of this report:




	 










	Exhibit Number*






	 






	Title of Document






	 






	Location








	 






	 






	 






	 






	 








	Item 31






	 






	Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certifications






	 






	 









	31.01







	 






	Certification
	of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial
	Officer


	Pursuant to Rule
	13a-14






	 






	Attached








	 






	 






	 






	 






	 








	Item 32






	 






	Section 1350 Certifications






	 






	 









	32.01







	 






	Certification
	Pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as Adopted Pursuant to Section
	906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 (Chief Executive Officer) and
	(Chief Financial Officer)






	 






	Attached








	 






	 






	 






	 






	 








	Item 101






	 






	Interactive Data File






	 






	 








	101






	 






	Interactive
	Data File






	 






	Attached








	_______________





	* All exhibits
	are numbered with the number preceding the decimal indicating the
	applicable SEC reference number in Item 601 and the number
	following the decimal indicating the sequence of the particular
	document.



	 





	 




	12










	 








	 






	SIGNATURES




	 




	Pursuant to the
	requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant
	has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the
	undersigned thereunto duly authorized.




	 








	 






	Registrant








	 






	 








	 






	INTERACTIVE MULTI-MEDIA AUCTION CORPORATION








	 






	 






	 








	 






	 






	 








	Date:
	September 16, 2016






	By:






	/s/
	JULIUSCESARLEGAYODEVERA/s/








	 






	 






	Julius
	Cesar Legayo De Vera








	 






	 






	President, Chief Executive Officer, Chief Financial Officer,
	Treasurer and Director








	 






	 






	(Principal
	Executive Officer, Principal Financial Officer and Principal
	Accounting Officer)








	 






	 






	 








	 






	 




	13


















	 






	Exhibit 31.01




	 






	CERTIFICATION OF PRINCIPAL EXECUTIVE OFFICER PURSUANT TO RULE
	13a-14




	 




	I,
	Julius Cesar Legayo De Vera, certify that:




	 




	1.           I
	have reviewed this quarterly report on Form 10-Q of Interactive
	Multi-Media Auction Corporation;




	 




	2.           Based
	on my knowledge, this report does not contain any untrue statement
	of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to
	make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which
	such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the
	period covered by this report;




	 




	3.           Based
	on my knowledge, the financial statements, and other financial
	information included in this report, fairly present in all material
	respects the financial condition, results of operations and cash
	flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in
	this report;




	 




	4.           The
	registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I are
	responsible for establishing and maintaining disclosure controls
	and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and
	15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial reporting (as
	defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the
	registrant and have:




	 




	(a)           designed
	such disclosure controls and procedures, or caused such disclosure
	controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to
	ensure that material information relating to the registrant,
	including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by
	others within those entities, particularly during the period in
	which this report is being prepared;




	 




	(b)           designed
	such internal control over financial reporting, or caused such
	internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our
	supervision, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
	reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
	statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
	accepted accounting principles;




	 




	(c)           evaluated
	the effectiveness of the registrant’s disclosure controls and
	procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the
	effectiveness of the disclosure controls and procedures, as of the
	end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation;
	and




	 




	(d)           disclosed
	in this report any change in the registrant’s internal
	control over financial reporting that occurred during the
	registrant’s most recent fiscal quarter (the
	registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual
	report) that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to
	materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over
	financial reporting; and




	 




	5.         
	The registrant’s other certifying officer(s) and I have
	disclosed, based on our most recent evaluation of internal control
	over financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and
	the audit committee of the registrant’s board of directors
	(or persons performing the equivalent functions):




	 




	(a)           all
	significant deficiencies and material weaknesses in the design or
	operation of internal control over financial reporting which are
	reasonably likely to adversely affect the registrant’s
	ability to record, process, summarize and report financial
	information; and




	 




	(b)           any
	fraud, whether or not material, that involves management or other
	employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s
	internal control over financial reporting.




	 




	Dated:
	September 16, 2016




	 




	 




	/s/JULIUS
	CESAR LEGAYO DE VERA/s/




	Julius
	Cesar Legayo De Vera




	President, Chief Executive Officer,




	Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Director




	(Principal
	Executive Officer, Principal Financial Officer and Principal
	Accounting Officer)





	 






	 

















	 






	Exhibit 32.01




	 






	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO




	18 U.S.C. SECTION 1350,




	AS ADOPTED PURSUANT TO




	SECTION 906 OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY ACT OF 2002




	 




	 




	In
	connection with the quarterly report of Interactive Multi-Media
	Auction Corporation (the “Company”) on Form 10-Q for
	the three months ended July 31, 2016, as filed with the Securities
	and Exchange Commission on the date hereof (the
	“Report”), I, Julius Cesar Legayo De Vera, Chief
	Executive Officer of the Company, certify, pursuant to
	18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section
	906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, that, to the best of my
	knowledge and belief:




	 




	(1)  the
	Report fully complies with the requirements of Section 13(a) or
	15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and




	 




	(2)  the
	information contained in the Report fairly presents, in all
	material respects, the financial condition and result of operations
	of the Company.




	 




	 




	September
	16, 2016




	 




	 




	 




	/s/JULIUS
	CESAR LEGAYO DE VERA/s/




	Julius
	Cesar Legayo De Vera




	President, Chief Executive Officer,




	Chief Financial Officer, Treasurer and Director




	(Principal
	Executive Officer, Principal Financial Officer and Principal
	Accounting Officer)





	 




	 




	 






	 















Interactive Multi-Media Auction: A Pump-And-Dump In Full Swing - Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corp (OTCMKTS:IMMA-OLD) | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Interactive Multi-Media Auction: A Pump-And-Dump In Full SwingMay. 7.15 | About: Interactive Multi-Media (IMMA) Bart van Velzen Special situations, nano-cap, short onlySummaryIMMA seems to consist solely of plans, but no means to implement them.The company only ever had one director, no employees and ZERO cash.The company's website is a mess.Stock promotions pumped the stock; the dump seems to have started in full swing.IMMA has almost unlimited downside.Introduction
Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation (OTCQB:IMMA) is a British Virgin Islands incorporated, Hong Kong based auctioneer, dealer and broker of, among others, fine art, fashion, design and décor. The company plans to create a live internet streaming auction style broadcast for an international viewing audience. It hopes to make money earning a commission on any sale. To date it has never generated any revenue though.
On April 26th, a Seeking Alpha article written by Stone Fox Capital on IMMA drew my attention. Stone Fox Capital in its article emphasizes the risks associated with an investment in IMMA, but is generally positive about the company. In my opinion, the article is very heavy on art-related auction sites in general, but very light on specifics about this particular company. The author concludes "The stock is a high-risk investment, but it provide a very unique investment opportunity not typically afforded investors in the public market these days." I decided to write a counter-article, as I couldn't disagree more. I believe IMMA is not suitable for any kind of long investment.
Background
IMMA went public in 2013, despite some initial concerns from the SEC. Thirty-two shareholders used the IPO to sell all of their shares; none of the proceeds went to the company.
Three years later, according to its latest quarterly filing, IMMA has literally zero cash, 75k in liabilities and no employees. Yet the current stock price of $0.67 assumes a market cap of $30 million. This is even after the stock crashed 50% on the 6th of May from a market cap of over 60 million previously.
At the time IMMA went public, there appeared to be two driving forces behind the company: Hong-Kong based Morpheus Financial Corporation and an American actress/producer named Amber McCandless. These two appear to go back quite a while. Both Morpheus and the McCandless family were involved in the IPO of Essential Innovations Technology (OTC:ESIV) in 2003.

Management
Amber McCandless signed on with IMMA as its CEO (and in effect its President, CFO, Treasurer, Secretary and Director). McCandless committed to spending approximately 20 hours per week on the business at the time, no other directors were appointed, no employees were hired. McCandless did have a background in art auctioning. From 2005 to 2008, one of her companies produced the Art Showcase Auction, a television show which apparently aired on DirecTV and UK's Sky TV. McCandless served as the on-air host of this program. I have never watched the show myself, but reading the description, the concept does not appear to be that different from what IMMA is trying to do ten years later, albeit over the internet.
Late 2014, with the company having made very little progress, McCandless resigned. She was succeeded by Julius Cesar Legayo de Vera, from what I can gather a 29-year-old engineer from the Philippines. It's unclear to me on what basis De Vera would be qualified for the job. The company apparently thinks he's qualified based on his "strong contacts and relationships throughout Asia" though.
Financials
Both McCandless and de Vera do not appear to have been compensated in any way for their work. McCandless can't complain though. Effective July 13, 2012, she was awarded an adjusted 16.9 million founder shares in exchange for payment of $4,225 (or 0.00025$ per share). She then went on to sell 4.9 million shares in a private transaction. Two days later Morpheus was awarded an adjusted 8 million founder shares in exchange for only $2,000, and then proceeded to sell 3.6 million shares in a private transaction.
(click to enlarge)
Source: SEC-filing Form S-1/A
As of February 9, 2015, McCandless still owns 12 million shares, Morpheus still owns 4.4 million shares. In total, IMMA has 45.2 million shares outstanding.

Many OTC-listed companies strapped for cash go about paying their bills in shares, in the process massively diluting existing shareholders over and over again. IMMA started out the same way: the company sold shares for cash and services at prices ranging from $0.0125 to $0.0375 per share to outside investors and unnamed consultants.
(click to enlarge)
Source: SEC-filing Form 10-K
However, since October 2013, the company stopped issuing any new shares. This is quite remarkable since the company at that point still didn't have any cash available. So what happened? IMMA basically appears to have stopped doing anything at all.
For the fiscal year ended October 31, 2014, IMMA reported a net loss of "only" $29,773. Considering this includes the fees from the auditor adding up to $20,300, it seems the company came to a complete halt.
In that light, the sudden resignation of McCandless in late 2014, as well as bringing in an inexperienced replacement, seems to make more sense. However, communicating to the public the company appears to have given up on its plan probably didn't sound all that attractive to some of the shareholders. With several parties still holding on to a significant number of shares, the show had to go on.
Stock price on the rise
Until 2014, shares of IMMA never generated any sort of outside interest. However, despite an apparent Cease Trader order from the British Columbia Securities Commission from April to October 2014, in May, July and August of 2014 three small but significant transactions took place. An adjusted 2,800 shares in total changed hands in an otherwise completely empty market at prices of $0.8125, $0.8375 and $0.875 respectively, up significantly from a previous closing price $0.25 per share. It would be very interesting to know which parties traded those shares as these prices seem to have set the floor for any future transactions.

Note: the stock prices mentioned above were adjusted for a 4-for-1 stock split end of 2014. The image listed below shows non-adjusted prices.
(click to enlarge)
Source: otcmarkets.com
In October 2014, trading volumes went up to a more healthy consistent level trading around the $0.80 level. In the following months, the stock price of IMMA kept on rising until it reached a high of $1.60 in April 2015.
IMMA's PR-offensive
This steady rise in share price could very well have something to do with IMMA becoming more active on the PR-front. IMMA announced its plans to have "the streaming integration along with fully functional e-commerce capabilities entirely operational on our website by Q3 2015."
It also signed a financial consulting agreement with Regassi Management Inc. This company will assist IMMA to "execute upon its overall business strategy and making introductions to investor sources that may assist the company in securing its necessary capitalization." According to the press release, Regassi, like IMMA incorporated on the British Virgin Islands, has "extensive experience working with publicly traded companies." Unfortunately, my attempts to verify these claims were unsuccessful. I wasn't able to find a single detail about Regassi anywhere on the internet.
Last but not least, IMMA announced plans to hold its first launch live auction event in San José, Mexico in November 2015. It promised investors it would attract high-profile Hollywood actors to become actively involved in the pre-promotion and on-site marketing of the event. IMMA promises more details within the next few weeks. It is unclear how IMMA actually intends to pay for these celebrities.
Stock promotion
In conjunction with the sudden spark of press releases, several investors reported receiving phone calls from stock promoters advertising IMMA.

(click to enlarge)
Source: investorshub.advfn.com/
Also, on the 6th of May, Futuremoneytrends.com started a promotional campaign.
(click to enlarge)
Source: e-mail Futuremoneytrends
Futuremoneytrends disclosed receiving 20,000 dollars for its advertising of IMMA from a third party company. The content of the e-mail is in fact in part a word-by-word copy of the previously mentioned Seeking Alpha article by Stone Fox Capital. I have contacted Stone Fox Capital about this: they have no knowledge of this promotional piece and have not authorized the usage of its content.
Website
I have tried contacting IMMA to ask a few questions about their business model. Unfortunately, their website is a complete mess. The contact form does not work, their only listed e-mail address isn't operational either.

Also, their website contains an "Interactive Gallery" with paintings that are supposedly (and contrary to what the company is communicating) for sale but go nowhere when you click on them. Furthermore, a lot of the links shown on the website are dead.
(click to enlarge)

Source: www.interactive-auction.com
Finally, mysteriously, the Twitter-account IMMA lists on their website does not contain their own tweets, they were copied from the Twitter account of art auction house Christie's, dating back to March 2014.
The original tweet from Christie's:
The copied tweet on the IMMA-website:

Conclusion
Even though Interactive Multi Media Auction Corporation might have started out as a genuine business idea, it appears to have changed into something less genuine along the way. Regardless, it's difficult to take any company seriously that has big dreams, but only appoints one director and no employees.
I believe the sole reason IMMA is currently still an active listed company is to offer an exit-opportunity to existing shareholders, at the expense of new investors. Even if the company is able to come up with some sort of an auction in Mexico later this year, I'm still very skeptical to IMMA ever becoming a success. It's not so much a problem with the business model, as it is with the management implementing it. Unlike Stone Fox Capital, I do not believe investing in IMMA offers "a unique investment opportunity." I believe it's basically flushing money down the toilet.
Timing is everything
As most investors know, timing in trading is everything. While researching this article, I found out the same concept applies to writing articles for Seeking Alpha.
On the day I was finishing up on this article, the stock price of IMMA came crashing down. On the same day, Futuremoneytrends send its promotional e-mail to its clients, shares in IMMA closed 51% lower at $0.67. While I am convinced this stock will go down and eventually will fall further, the extent and the timing of the dump took me by surprise. The goal of this article was to warn investors not to buy into the hype surrounding this company. Unfortunately, it appears I have been too late.

I have seriously considered to not submit this article as most of the damage has already been done, but at the current stock price, I still believe IMMA to be grossly overvalued. Also, the trading volumes (225k) on the 6th of May was relatively limited to what one would expect for such a price drop. Perhaps selling parties overestimated the effect of the Futuremoneytrends article on investors and overestimated the amount of shares they were able to dump in the market. Perhaps several different parties all went for the exit at once.
Considering IMMA itself promises investors future press releases containing names of endorsing Hollywood actors, this story might not be over yet. For that reason, I decided to publish this article anyway. Hopefully, it will help future investors when approached by a promoter or otherwise in possible future pump promotions. At the very least, it will provide guidance to investors researching IMMA on Seeking Alpha beyond the previous article written by Stone Fox Capital.
Disclosure
I am short IMMA through an owned entity. I have no business relationship with any of the companies mentioned in this article. This article is not an advice to either buy or sell; it expresses my own personal opinion.
Disclosure: The author is short IMMA. 
The author wrote this article themselves, and it expresses their own opinions. The author is not receiving compensation for it (other than from Seeking Alpha). The author has no business relationship with any company whose stock is mentioned in this article.
Editor's Note: This article covers one or more stocks trading at less than $1 per share and/or with less than a $100 million market cap. Please be aware of the risks associated with these stocks.About this article:ExpandAuthor payment: $35 + $0.01/page view. Authors of PRO articles receive a minimum guaranteed payment of $150-500.Tagged: Services, Business Services, ChinaWant to share your opinion on this article? Add a comment.Disagree with this article? Submit your own.To report a factual error in this article, click hereFollow Bart van Velzen and get email alerts





Services including Restaurant and Retail Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Services including Restaurant and Retail StocksNetflix Delivers A Stellar QuarterNFLX• Yesterday, 5:41 PM • Sramana Mitra•5 CommentsDryShips: It Ain't Over YetDRYS• Yesterday, 5:21 PM • Bill Maurer•15 CommentsAltice USA 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesATUS• Yesterday, 4:46 PM • SA TranscriptsCanfor Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCFPZF• Yesterday, 4:04 PM • SA TranscriptsEastside Distilling's Capital Raise - Is This A Nanocap To Watch?ESDI• Yesterday, 3:45 PM • Ryan Surber•5 CommentsDillard's: The Bearish Side Of The ArgumentDDS• Yesterday, 3:29 PM • Courage & Conviction Investing•8 CommentsInterpublic Group Of Companies Selloff Overreaction Presents A Buying Opportunity For The Long-Term Income InvestorsIPG• Yesterday, 3:13 PM • Accelerating Dividends•4 CommentsChipotle: 2017 Q2 Shows 18 Month 'Recovery' Hasn't Happened And, Given Risk, It's Unlikely It Ever WillCMG• Yesterday, 2:32 PM • J.G. Collins•7 CommentsVerisk Analytics To Acquire G2 Web Services For Financial Risk SolutionsVRSK• Yesterday, 2:15 PM • Donovan JonesMatson Weakness Before Earnings - Buying Opportunity Or Steer Clear?MATX• Yesterday, 1:40 PM • James Sands•4 CommentsStarbucks: There Is No JustificationSBUX• Yesterday, 1:28 PM • Quad 7 Capital•68 CommentsLargest Acquisition To Date A Plus For StarbucksSBUX• Yesterday, 1:03 PM • ALT Perspective•22 CommentsYY Inc. Is UndervaluedYY• Yesterday, 12:30 PM • John Bay, CFA•6 CommentsStill Upside For Lufthansa?DLAKF• Yesterday, 12:03 PM • Frederic Laudenklos•1 CommentThe Skies Are Clear For OMABEditors' Pick • OMAB• Yesterday, 11:37 AM • Ian Bezek•11 CommentsHub Group - Was The Recent Stock Price Run Up Too Fast, Or Did Yesterday's Earnings Miss Justify The Stock Price Beat-Down?HUBG• Yesterday, 11:09 AM • James SandsChegg: Can The Run Continue?CHGG• Yesterday, 11:06 AM • Michael Battat•3 CommentsAimia's Senior Secured Note: 8.5% Yield With Assets Supporting 100% RecoveryEditors' Pick • GAPFF• Yesterday, 9:58 AM • Jason Li•5 CommentsSonic Automotive Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSAH• Yesterday, 9:53 AM • SA TranscriptsLithia Motors, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLAD• Yesterday, 9:50 AM • SA TranscriptsHibbett's E-Commerce Move: Too Little Too LateHIBB• Yesterday, 9:39 AM • SiddharthCapital Product Partners L.P. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCPLP• Yesterday, 9:18 AM • SA TranscriptsGNC: Did Goldman Sachs Really Just Reiterate Its $5 Price Target?GNC• Yesterday, 9:16 AM • Courage & Conviction Investing•51 CommentsNatural Health Trends Corporation: Buy It For Value, Buy It For GrowthNHTC• Yesterday, 8:39 AM • Ty Huggins•2 CommentsAir France-KLM 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAFRAF• Yesterday, 8:34 AM • SA TranscriptsFly High American AirlinesAAL• Yesterday, 8:30 AM • Chris Hulsey•8 CommentsSecuritas A BB 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesSCTBF• Yesterday, 6:14 AM • SA TranscriptsLowe's Companies: A Fast-Growing Dividend King Worth ReviewingLOW• Yesterday, 5:50 AM • Simply Safe Dividends•18 CommentsWhat Makes Darden Restaurants Attractive In The Long Term?DRI• Yesterday, 3:32 AM • RCK Financial Services•7 CommentsWorld Wrestling Entertainment, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesWWE• Yesterday, 12:52 AM • SA TranscriptsNavios Maritime Partners L.P. 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesNMM• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:19 PM • SA TranscriptsGNC: Strong Earnings Or BustGNC• Thu, Jul. 27, 7:22 PM • Chandler Clinkingbeard•15 CommentsSouthwest Airlines - Business ReviewLUV• Thu, Jul. 27, 7:00 PM • Grassroots Research•5 CommentsPenske Automotive Group, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPAG• Thu, Jul. 27, 6:08 PM • SA TranscriptsBusinesses Risk Lawsuits For False Brand Supply Chain Claims, EU RulesAHODF• Thu, Jul. 27, 3:58 PM • Gabriel Thoumi, CFABarnes & Noble Might Actually Be Worth $1 Billion Or MoreBKS• Thu, Jul. 27, 3:49 PM • Daniel Jones•5 CommentsCapstone: Pending Catalyst + High Growth, No Debt, Deep Value StockEditors' Pick • CAPC• Thu, Jul. 27, 3:05 PM • Intelligent Walker•5 CommentsUPS: Put Option Idea For IncomeUPS• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:56 PM • Pat Stout•13 CommentsLa Quinta Holdings (LQ) Investor Presentation - SlideshowLQ• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:53 PM • SA TranscriptsMichael Kors Holdings (KORS) Acquires Jimmy Choo (JYMHF) - SlideshowKORS• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:49 PM • SA TranscriptsAmerco: Size MattersUHAL• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:49 PM • Rip Van Winkle Investing•4 CommentsReport: Expedia Invests $350 Million In TravelokaEXPE• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:29 PM • Donovan JonesDorel Industries Inc. - Turnaround Unlikely To Happen Any Time SoonEditors' Pick • DIIBF• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:11 PM • Shahid Manzoor, CFAChipotle: When Price Gets IllCMG• Thu, Jul. 27, 1:34 PM • Andrew McElroy•17 CommentsNexstar Media Group: 18% Free Cash Flow Yield And Significant Upside As Broadcaster Sentiment ImprovesEditors' Pick • NXST• Thu, Jul. 27, 1:28 PM • Soldier of Fortune•3 CommentsChipotle - Gauging The Potential Effects Of The Norovirus OutbreakCMG• Thu, Jul. 27, 12:35 PM • Kenra Investors•3 CommentsComcast's Q2: Solid Numbers, Stock A Buy Even At Low YieldCMCSA• Thu, Jul. 27, 12:33 PM • Steven MallasDespite Strong Q2 Results, Wynn Shares Took A Hit - As Always, They Will Recovery QuicklyWYNN• Thu, Jul. 27, 11:59 AM • Howard Jay Klein•20 CommentsAre Wal-Mart's Top Management Able To Estimate EPS Accurately? Let's Find OutWMT• Thu, Jul. 27, 11:36 AM • Ville Peltonen•1 CommentUPS: More Downside Ahead?UPS• Thu, Jul. 27, 11:36 AM • Quad 7 Capital•12 CommentsSirius XM Moves Higher On Q2 Earnings ReportSIRI• Thu, Jul. 27, 10:55 AM • Spencer Osborne•40 CommentsLandstar System, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLSTR• Thu, Jul. 27, 10:36 AM • SA TranscriptsLKQ Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLKQ• Thu, Jul. 27, 10:36 AM • SA TranscriptsA Misunderstood And Overvalued Growth StockCSGP• Thu, Jul. 27, 10:32 AM • David Trainer•1 CommentSirius XM Posts Strong Results - Raises GuidanceSIRI• Thu, Jul. 27, 10:00 AM • Crunching Numbers•71 CommentsCimpress N.V. 2017 Q4 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCMPR• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:54 AM • SA TranscriptsComcast Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCMCSA• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:52 AM • SA TranscriptsCharter Communications, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCHTR• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:52 AM • SA TranscriptsNew Media 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesNEWM• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:50 AM • SA TranscriptsAllegion plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesALLE• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:49 AM • SA TranscriptsWhat Was Found Inside McDonald's Might Surprise YouMCD• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:46 AM • David Zanoni•7 CommentsChipotle: Getting The Right PriceCMG• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:31 AM • Stone Fox Capital•7 CommentsTractor Supply Bounces BackTSCO• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:18 AM • Samuel Smith•9 CommentsCostco Wholesale Corp.: Strong Financials, Fairly Valued StockCOST• Thu, Jul. 27, 9:16 AM • Exclusive Capital•10 CommentsScreening For Potential Spin-Offs: Walt DisneyDIS• Thu, Jul. 27, 7:40 AM • Eric Nickolaison•20 CommentsDiana Containerships Adopts DryShips Model (Kalani); Reverse Split AgainDCIX• Thu, Jul. 27, 7:13 AM • Research & Investment•11 CommentsKohl's - It's Worth A Look At These LevelsKSS• Thu, Jul. 27, 7:10 AM • Kenra Investors•2 CommentsMcDonald's Two Businesses, One StrategyMCD• Thu, Jul. 27, 7:06 AM • The Hedged EconomistRoss Stores - Be Careful With This DipROST• Thu, Jul. 27, 6:59 AM • Kenra Investors•9 CommentsTrinity Industries: The Market's Showing Signs Of RecoveryTRN• Thu, Jul. 27, 4:43 AM • Daniel Jones•8 CommentsThe Home Depot Is A Strong BuyHD• Thu, Jul. 27, 2:13 AM • Kush Patel•9 CommentsDiscovery And Scripps: An Odd Couple In A MergerSNI, DISCA• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:40 PM • Jay Wei•8 CommentsGenuine Parts: A Dividend King Trading At An 18-Month LowGPC• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:03 PM • Simply Safe Dividends•17 CommentsDryShips: Acquisitions Fully Funded. What Now?DRYS• Wed, Jul. 26, 7:29 PM • Morningsidepark•42 CommentsLas Vegas Sands Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLVS• Wed, Jul. 26, 7:07 PM • SA Transcripts•6 Comments123456...802Next Page

































































InterActive Multi-Media Auction Corp. | The Auction Blogs for Scams and Warnings on Vimeo























Upload









×




 Watch in our app 

Open in app



















Please enable JavaScript to experience Vimeo in all of its glory.





InterActive Multi-Media Auction Corp. | The Auction Blogs for Scams and Warnings



from

Rica Santos




2 years ago







http://interactivemultimediaauctioncorp.com/
InterActive Multi-Media Auction Corp.  (IMMA) is a group of researchers worldwide with collaboration of their marketing experiences provides information of websites on where to buy confiscated / seized  property WORLDWIDE. These confiscated properties offered to the public are from individuals or businesses who sells scam products / materials which where identified by government agencies.  The items will basically be initially stored or monitored until proper proceedings of disposal procedures are finalize. These SCAM Products/Properties are frequently posted and updated online in each corresponding government agencies in their WANTED-WARNING portfolios all over the world. 





































CapitalCube - Fundamental Analysis On Demand















































































































InterActive Multi-Media Auction Corp. | About Us 






















































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 




Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation News - Company Information - The New York Times






















































Sections
Home
Search
Skip to content









Times Topics|Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation

 

Search


Log In

Settings




Close search

search sponsored by






 






Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation















Most EmailedMost ViewedRecommended














Rss Feeds On Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation
Subscribe to an RSS feed on this topic.  What is RSS?





Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation




Get Alerts On Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation
Receive My Alerts e-mails on topics covered on this page.

INTERACTIVE MULTI-MEDIA AUCTION CORPORATION

More Alerts >>





 














Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corp company : Shareholders, managers and business summary | OTC Bulletin Board:  | 4-Traders














































































 




Log in






E-mail



Password







Remember




Forgot password ?









Become a member for free
Sign up





Sign up




New memberSign up for FREE


New customerDiscover our portfolios












 United States
 United Kingdom
 France
 Deutschland
 Schweiz (DE)
 Suisse (FR)










Settings

            Dynamic quotes 


OFFON








 








Markets
Equities
North AmericaEuropeAsiaOceaniaMiddle East» More Equities

Indexes
DOW JONESS&P 500NASDAQ 100TSX COMPFTSE 100» More Indexes

Currency / Forex
EUR / USDGBP / USDUSD / JPYUSD / CADAUD / USD» More Currencies

Commodities
GOLDCrude Oil (WTI)Crude Oil (BRENT)SILVERPLATINUM» More Commodities


 News
Latest News
CompaniesMarketsEconomyCurrency / ForexCommoditiesInterest RatesBusiness LeadersFinancial calendarEconomic calendar

Listed company
Analyst reco.RumorsIPOsCapital Markets TransactionsNew ContractsProfits warningsAppointmentsPress ReleasesEventsCorporate actions

Sector News
EnergyBasic MaterialsIndustrialsConsumer CyclicalConsumer Non-CyclicalFinancialsHealthcareTechnologyTelecommunications ServicesUtilities


 Analysis
All AnalysisCommentariesIndex AnalysisStock Trading StrategiesCommodity AnalysisForex Analysis

 Stock Picks
All stock picks

 Portfolios
My Portfolio
Virtual portfolios
4-Traders Portfolios
European PortfolioUSA PortfolioAsian Portfolio


 Screeners
Market Screener HomeFundamental Analyse
Top Investor RatingTop Trading RatingTop ConsensusGrowth stocksYield stocksLow valuations

Technical Analysis
Oversold stocksOverbought stocksClose to resistancesClose to supportsAccumulation phaseMost volatile stocks


 Watchlists
My Watchlists
Watchlists
Top Lists
Yield stocksGrowth stocksUndervalued Stocks


 Top / Flop
Top News
Most Read NewsHot News

Top Fundamentals
Top CapitalizationTop YieldTop PERTop ConsensusTop Fundamentals

Top Technicals
Top RSIUnusual volumesTop GapsTop STIM

Top Movers
Top USATop CanadaTop U.K.Top GermanyTop EuropeTop Asia


 Tools
Market ScreenerDynamic chartFinancial calendarEconomic calendarSector researchCurrency converter

 Our Services
Premium AccessDiscover our Services

 



















 







4-Traders Homepage  >  Equities  >  OTC Bulletin Board  >  Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corp       VGG4895B1085 DOWNLOAD REPORT










     INTERACTIVE MULTI-MEDIA AUCTION CORP     


Add to my list    

Mes dernières consult.Most popular
Manage my lists

















 







No quotes available

--
USD
 
--.--%











 







SummaryNewsCompany 


















 










Business Summary


Provides vacation accommodation servicesStop Sleep Go, Inc. is a development stage company, which provides vacation accommodation services.It intends to operate based on marketing and selling products using on-line e-commerce platform which provides a live streaming auction production.Its products include Investment Fine Art, Decorative Works of Art, Fashion Items, Interior Design and Decor products, and Miscellaneous products.The company was founded on July 13, 2012 and is headquartered in London, the Untied Kingdom.




 





Managers










 NameAgeSinceTitleJaime De Leon Melendres702017President, CEO, CFO, Secretary & Treasurer 



Equities


 











Vote QuantityFloatCompany-owned sharesTotal Float


Share A
1
46,200,000
29,800,000
64.5%
0
0.0%
64.5% 

 


Shareholders









 NameEquities%Amber McCandless 12,000,000
                26.5%Morpheus Financial Corp.                4,400,000
                9.73% 
 







Sector
TechnologySoftware & IT Services Software & IT Services  Internet Services   E-commerce & Auction Services 
 





Sector E-commerce & Auction Services 


1st jan.Capitalization (M$)

INTERACTIVE MULTI-MEDIA AUCTION CORP0





ALIBABA GROUP HOLDING75.55%400 526

JD.COM77.52%65 769

EBAY21.83%39 644

RAKUTEN INC18.27%17 370

MERCADOLIBRE83.58%12 630

SHOPIFY INC (US)110.94%9 858

USS CO., LTD.21.11%6 366

BOOHOO.COM PLC76.25%3 446

ROCKET INTERNET SE-7.89%3 421

CARSALES.COM LTD10.13%2 429

TRADE DESK INC91.90%2 217

ZOOPLUS AG35.02%1 318

PCHOME ONLINE INC--.--%842

AO WORLD PLC-34.81%711

HAWESKO HOLDING AG14.46%519

GAMING INNOVATION GROUP INC46.45%514

IMARKETKOREA INC--.--%409

SHOP APOTHEKE EUROPE NV40.76%405

ENIGMO INC16.75%332

DELTICOM AG-11.71%232


Sector E-commerce & Auction Services 
 


Connections : Interactive Multi-Media Au



Stop Sleep Go Inc








Jaime De Leon Melendres





Company contact information
Stop Sleep Go, Inc.20-22 Wenlock RoadLondon, Greater London N1 7GUPhone : +44.207.608.5510
 


            © 2017 People , Fundamentals and Ownership    








 



























4-traders.com :MarketsNewsAnalysisStock PicksPortfoliosScreenersWatchlistsTop / FlopToolsOur ServicesAbout :Surperformance SASContact usAdvertiseLegal informationsAbout usStay Connected :FacebookTwitterPartners :Börse: Aktien, Kurse und NachrichtenBest tweets 




   Copyright © 2017 Surperformance. All rights reserved.  









 


  














Slave
















INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP IPO - NASDAQ.com

































































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
    Markets > 
    IPOs  > 
    Company IPO Overview





INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP IPO




Overview




News Headlines




Financials & Filings




Experts















Key Data
Use of Proceeds
Competitors




Company Overview


Company Name
INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP


Company Address
2/F ETON TOWER, 8 HYSAN AVENUECAUSEWAY BAYHONG KONG, SAR 00000


Company Phone
(852) 291 07795


Company Website
www.interactive-auction.com


CEO
Amber McCandless


Employees  (as of 10/10/2013) 
1


State of Inc
 -- 


Fiscal Year End
10/31


Status
Filed (1/7/2013)


Proposed Symbol
 -- 


Exchange
OTCBB


Share Price
$0.15


Shares Offered
4,700,000


Offer Amount
$705,000.00


Total Expenses
$40,200.00


Shares Over Alloted
 -- 


Shareholder Shares Offered
4,700,000


Shares Outstanding
11,200,000


Lockup Period (days)
180


Lockup Expiration
 -- 


Quiet Period Expiration
 -- 


CIK
0001565430




We will not receive any proceeds from the resale of the securities offered 
through this Prospectus by the selling security holders. The selling security 
holders will receive all proceeds from this offering.


Each of the companies referenced in the section below sells Investment Grade 
Fine Art, Decorative Works of Art, Fashion Items, Interior Design and Décor 
Products as either all or part of their overall business. They each service the 
same market that we target and, at present, they each have a more established 
name in the market and own greater market share than our company. 
  
The information in this section is to provide necessary general background 
detail on the competitive landscape in relation to our operations. 
  
Christie’s (www.christies.com) 
  
Christie’s is the world’s leading auction house with auction & private sales, 
e-commerce revenues of $5 billion for 2011/2012. 
  
Christie’s has recently added significant emphasis to the premise of on-line 
auction format sales. 72% of the clients they have drawn to their on-line live 
auctions are actually new to Christies (i.e. not historical brick and mortar 
auction clients). Christie has seen a 31% increase in on-line sales in the Asian
marketplace. Christies recently set the greatest sales mark in on-line history 
with a $10MM world record on-line auction purchase. 
  
E-bay (www.ebay.com) 
  
EBay has pioneered and internationalized automated online person-to-person 
auctioning. Previously, such commerce was conducted through garage sales, 
collectibles shows, flea markets, and classified advertisements. An online 
marketplace facilitates easy perusing for buyers and enables sellers to list an 
item for sale within minutes of registering. 
  
Browsing and bidding on auctions is free, but sellers are charged transaction 
fees for the right to sell their goods on eBay. There are two kinds of 
transaction fees: 
  
When an item is listed on eBay, a nonrefundable insertion fee is charged based 
on the seller's opening bid on the item. 
  
Once the auction is completed, a final value fee is charged. This fee generally 
ranges from 1.25 percent to 5 percent of the final sale price. 
  
EBay also upsells its listing fees with enhanced auction features, including 
highlighted or bold listings, featured status, and other ways for sellers to 
increase the visibility of their items. 
  
Once the auction is finished, eBay notifies the buyer and seller via email. 
Completing the transaction is then up to the seller and the buyer, and eBay 
collects its final value fee independent of payment and shipment. 
  
One Kings Lane: 
  
One Kings Lane is the leading flash sales site for the home market, offering 
members access to spectacular designer home decor, furnishings, accessories, and
gifts. One Kings Lane works directly with leading home brands to bring the very 
best products at exceptional prices to its members – every day of the week. One 
Kings Lane also partners with top designers, decorators and industry insiders 
to deliver content that inspires, enlightens and informs. They were featured in 
InStyle Magazine as the Best of the Web in 2012. One Kings Lane differentiates 
itself from other deals sites and online retailers by investing heavily in 
quality design and high quality curated content. An ecommerce company for home 
decor, it recently raised $50 million in Series D financing led by Institutional
Venture Partners (IVP) with additional investment from Kleiner Perkins Caufield 
& Byers (KPCB), Greylock Partners, Tiger Global Management, and new investor, 
Scripps Networks Interactive, the home to TV shows like HGTV and The Food 
Network. This brings the total amount raised to $117 million. 
  
Some other similar on-line players of recent note and mention: 
  
. Decor Insider : Decor Insider opened April 1, 2010 and offers "to-the-trade" 
  home furnishings at reduced prices.  

. Rue La La : Rue La La is an invitation-only site that features private sale 
  boutiques that are open for a set amount of time.  
  
. Achica : Ach ica is a luxury lifestyle store, which offers luxury home and 
  lifestyle brands.


Company Description
We were incorporated in the British Virgin Islands on July 13, 2012. We are a
development stage company; having entered into the development stage on July 13,
2012. We intend to operate as a Hong Kong based Internet marketer, auctioneer,
dealer and broker of high quality and unique products and


 services relating to
fine art, fashion, design, décor, among others. Sales to clients are to be
transacted via a live internet streaming auction style broadcast available to a
brand-conscious demographic that will encompass an international viewing
audience. We will act as a facilitator and intermediary to all those purveyors
of specialized goods that we provide through our special onsite broadcasts. We
intend to transmit in a live internet streaming format from a variety of
different global locations from which we may then highlight and introduce
products and goods available from the particular geographic market where we are
located that might otherwise not be seen by those from outside that local market
area.

Our offices are currently located at 2/F Eton Tower, 8 Hysan Avenue, Causeway
Bay, Hong Kong, SAR, China. Our phone number is 852-2910-7795. Website:
www.interactive-auction.com.


Full Description

The IPO profiles may contain historical records. Please visit the latest IPOs for the most recent information.




Company Financials



Revenue
 -- 


Net Income
-$55,829


Total Assets
$0






Total Liabilities
$51,879


Stockholders' Equity
-$51,879




Company Filings

                                    Viewing: 1 - 7 Total: 7
					            



Company Name
Form Type
Date Received
View



INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP
S-1/A
10/10/2013
Filing



INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP
S-1/A
9/27/2013
Filing



INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP
S-1/A
8/27/2013
Filing



INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP
S-1/A
7/17/2013
Filing



INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP
S-1/A
6/3/2013
Filing



INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP
S-1/A
4/16/2013
Filing



INTERACTIVE MULTI MEDIA AUCTION CORP
S-1
1/7/2013
Filing







Experts


Auditor
Ingenium Accounting Associates


Company Counsel
Lynton Spencer


Transfer Agent
The company itself


Underwriter
Self-underwritten






                                There are no news stories for this IPO at this time.
                            












Today's Market Activity





NASDAQ

6374.68


-7.51
 ▼ 
0.12%





DJIA

21830.31


33.76
 ▲ 
0.15%





S&P 500

2472.10


-3.32
 ▼ 
0.13%










Data as of Jul 28, 2017


Try for Free: NASDAQ LiveQuotes Platform



View All















Latest News Headlines




                            Sprint proposes merger with Charter Communications - WSJ
                        



	                     7:53PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Union cheers as trucks kept out of U.S. self-driving legislation
                        



	                     6:57PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            RPT-Hundreds of U.S. counties at risk for no Obamacare insurer in 2018
                        



	                     6:48PM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Wells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncovered
                        



	                     6:41PM ET  - Reuters
	                





View All Latest Headlines

















Upcoming Earnings



Company
Expected Report Date




AAPL
Jul 25, 2017


ODFL
Jul 27, 2017


FB
Jul 26, 2017


TSLA
Aug 2, 2017


T
Jul 20, 2017


AMZN
Jul 27, 2017


VZ
Jul 27, 2017


GE
Jul 21, 2017





Earnings Calendar


























CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX





































Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation 2015 Strategy ReportHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,472.10-3.32 (-0.13%)Dow 3021,830.31+33.76 (+0.15%)Nasdaq6,374.68-7.51 (-0.12%)LISTENWho is the face of pro baseball?Yahoo Finance's Dan Roberts and Myles Udland debate the business of baseballInteractive Multi-Media Auction Corporation 2015 Strategy ReportAccesswireMarch 23, 2015ReblogShareTweetShareHONG KONG, CHINA / ACCESSWIRE / March 23, 2015 / Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation (IMMA) is truly pleased to provide this strategy report to its shareholders and the investor community.  Said Company President Mr. De Vera, "As it relates to the live-streaming nature of our website we are now in process of completing our assessment of the premier internet streaming service providers in the marketplace and which of those to utilize on our site for our planned live auction events. Furthermore, in addition to the actual streaming functionality this will provide us to disseminate the auction to the viewing audience on-line, we plan to establish and operate a top-tier e-commerce website in support of the live streaming international broadcasts. We plan to have the streaming integration along with fully functional e-commerce capabilities entirely operational on our website by Q3 2015, at which time our website should be extremely well positioned to effectively stream our live auction while simultaneously accepting and transacting any number of on-line credit card payments.  Given much consideration and the review of many available global site locations we have now narrowed down our search in determining consideration of where we will hold our first launch live event planned for fiscal Q4 2015. It is our intent to undertake our initial broadcast in either New Delhi, India, or in San Jose, Mexico, such final decision that will be made firm as negotiations with each party continue to evolve. At this time, it is our goal to make a formal announcement of our first launch event and location within 60-90 days from now.  On a final note, through external relationships, the Company has started to engage dialogue with certain high-profile actors such that we may have these celebrity endorsers actively involved in the pre-promotion and on-site marketing of our proposed upcoming live events."  About the Company: Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation is engaged in plans to act as a marketer, auctioneer, dealer and broker of high quality and unique products and services relating to fine art, fashion, design, and décor, among others. Sales to clients are to be transacted via a live internet streaming auction style broadcast available to a brand-conscious demographic that will encompass an international viewing audience. The Company intends to act as a facilitator and intermediary to purveyors of specialized goods that will be provided through our special onsite broadcasts. We expect to transmit in a live internet streaming format from a variety of different global locations from which we may then highlight and introduce products and goods available from the particular geographic market where we are located that might otherwise not be seen by those from outside that local market area.  Forward-Looking Statements: This news release contains "forward-looking statements," as defined within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including statements, which are not purely historical, regarding beliefs, plans, expectations or intentions (such as those relating to future business, future results of operations or financial condition, new or planned features or services, or management strategies). You can identify these forward-looking statements by words such as "may," "will," "would," "should," "could," "expect," "anticipate," "believe," "estimate," "intend," "plan" and/or any other such similar expressions. The Company assumes no obligation to update these forward-looking statements, or to update the reasons why actual results could differ from those presented. Investors should consult all of the information set forth herein and should also refer to the risk factors disclosure outlined in our periodic reports filed from time to time with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Contact:  Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation Tel: +852-2910-7795 www.interactive-auction.comSOURCE: Interactive Multi-Media Auction CorporationReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextChina's exiled tycoon Guo 'fabricated' corruption claims: XinhuaReutersThis Will Be In Everyone's Household By 2020Banyan HillSponsoredMore People Are Cutting the Cord and Dumping Pay TVFortuneHere's What's Coming to Netflix, Hulu, Amazon and HBO in AugustTimeAs downloaded music fades away, Apple discontinues older iPodsReutersEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredTCA Roundup: Hulu Acquires ABC’s ‘TGIF’ Series, Mindy Kaling Teases Her Show’s Final SeasonVarietyThe 'two pizza rule' is a secret to productive meetings that helped Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos become one of the world's richest menBusiness InsiderThe real reason overseas manufacturing is coming to AmericaYahoo FinanceDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredHere are the US targets North Korea most likely wants to nukeBusiness InsiderTorrei Hart Addresses Amber Rose's Offensive ‘Traditionally Attractive’ CommentEssenceChevron and Exxon Mobil have a tough path ahead: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoTrunk Club. Making Sense of Style.Trunk ClubSponsoredStocks mixed after heavy earnings weekTrump to cops: 'Please don't be too nice' while arresting 'thugs,' and don't worry about their heads when you toss them in the 'paddy wagon'Business InsiderNorth Korea says 2nd ICBM test puts 'entire' US in rangeJohn: Doesn't that little fat kid know that if he actually fires a missile at something other than water, his country will just be annihilated?Join the Conversation1 / 55.2k








Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation Announces Corporate UpdateHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,472.10-3.32 (-0.13%)Dow 3021,830.31+33.76 (+0.15%)Nasdaq6,374.68-7.51 (-0.12%)LISTENWho is the face of pro baseball?Yahoo Finance's Dan Roberts and Myles Udland debate the business of baseballInteractive Multi-Media Auction Corporation Announces Corporate UpdateAccesswireNovember 10, 2014ReblogShareTweetShareHONG KONG, CHINA / ACCESSWIRE / November 10, 2014 /  Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation (IMMA: OTCBB/OTCQB) is truly pleased to provide this corporate update pertaining to the organization and its going forward business operations.On October 28, 2014, Mr. Julius Cesar Legayo De Vera became the President and CEO of the Company, Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation. Mr. De Vera has extensive contacts throughout the Asian and Middle-Eastern marketplaces in relation to the manufacturing and distribution of retail goods, textiles and other marketable fashion, sculpture or artistic related wares. It is expected that his business network and working relationships should allow the Company to effectively proceed to execute its business goals and objectives.Mr. De Vera, President/CEO, stated, "I am extremely excited to join the organization. It is my immediate intent to aggressively assist the Company to take considerable strides towards achieving its corporate objectives and initiatives during the upcoming Calendar year. I am confident that my relationships with parties in aligned industry sectors throughout Asia and the Middle-East can provide the Company access to the products and fineries it needs to launch a unique and successful auction platform. The Company itself feels strongly about the strategic decisions it has made to focus the vast majority of its business directives towards these global market regions in particular over the coming years. It is in these parts of the World that we believe our greatest opportunity for product differentiation and sustained and systematic long-term growth and prosperity will exist for our business enterprise and our shareholder base."About the CompanyInteractive Multi-Media Auction Corporation is engaged in plans to act as a marketer, auctioneer, dealer and broker of high quality and unique products and services relating to fine art, fashion, design, and décor, among others. Sales to clients are to be transacted via a live internet streaming auction style broadcast available to a brand-conscious demographic that will encompass an international viewing audience. The Company intends to act as a facilitator and intermediary to purveyors of specialized goods that will be provided through our special onsite broadcasts. We expect to transmit in a live internet streaming format from a variety of different global locations from which we may then highlight and introduce products and goods available from the particular geographic market where we are located that might otherwise not be seen by those from outside that local market area.Forward-Looking StatementsThis news release contains "forward-looking statements," as defined within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, including statements, which are not purely historical, regarding beliefs, plans, expectations or intentions (such as those relating to future business, future results of operations or financial condition, new or planned features or services, or management strategies). You can identify these forward-looking statements by words such as "may," "will," "would," "should," "could," "expect," "anticipate," "believe," "estimate," "intend," "plan" and/or any other such similar expressions. The Company assumes no obligation to update these forward-looking statements, or to update the reasons why actual results could differ from those presented. Investors should consult all of the information set forth herein and should also refer to the risk factors disclosure outlined in our periodic reports filed from time to time with the Securities and Exchange Commission. For more information contact:  Interactive Multi-Media Auction Corporation Tel: +852-2910-7795 www.interactive-auction.comSOURCE: Interactive Multi-Media Auction CorporationReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextThursday’s Vital Data: Advanced Micro Devices, Inc. (AMD), Facebook Inc (FB) and United States Steel Corporation (X)InvestorPlaceEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredThe 'two pizza rule' is a secret to productive meetings that helped Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos become one of the world's richest menBusiness InsiderThe real reason overseas manufacturing is coming to AmericaYahoo FinanceHere are the US targets North Korea most likely wants to nukeBusiness InsiderDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredAT&T executives to run combined company after Time Warner dealReutersChevron and Exxon Mobil have a tough path ahead: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoStocks mixed after heavy earnings weekThis Will Be In Everyone's Household By 2020Banyan HillSponsoredTrump to cops: 'Please don't be too nice' while arresting 'thugs,' and don't worry about their heads when you toss them in the 'paddy wagon'Business InsiderWells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncoveredReutersAPNewsBreak: Yellowstone park cracks down on sex harassmentAssociated PressTrunk Club. Making Sense of Style.Trunk ClubSponsoredChina Eastern Airlines to acquire 10% of Air France-KLMAFPMy bullish view on stocks hasn't changed one iota: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoNorth Korea says 2nd ICBM test puts 'entire' US in rangeJohn: Doesn't that little fat kid know that if he actually fires a missile at something other than water, his country will just be annihilated?Join the Conversation1 / 55.2k








